Hawaii, session 2025, SB677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that as an island state, Hawaii is uniquely prone to the impacts of climate change.  The State is experiencing increased hurricane and tropical cyclone activity, rising temperatures, hazardous inland flooding and landslides, coastal erosion and sea level rise, drought, and increased wildfires. The legislature further finds that many specific plans related to the State's climate adaptation have been published, including the coral bleaching recovery plan, Hawaii sea level rise vulnerability and adaptation report, multi-hazard mitigation plan, Hawaii highways climate adaptation action plan, and Hawaii 2050 sustainability plan.  However, there is no statewide climate adaptation and resilience implementation plan assessing the overall financial risk of the State associated with climate change. The purpose of this Act is to require the office of planning and sustainable development to develop and publish a Hawaii climate adaptation and resilience implementation plan. SECTION 2.  Chapter 226, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§226-    Hawaii climate adaptation and resilience implementation plan.  (a) The office shall publish a Hawaii climate adaptation and resilience implementation plan that aligns with the Hawaii State Planning Act, state functional and county general plans, Hawaii 2050 sustainability plan, county climate and sustainability plans, the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation initiative, the State's multiple sustainability and climate targets, and the most accurate climate data available. (b) The purpose of the Hawaii climate adaptation and resilience implementation plan shall be to: (1)  Determine the overall financial risk to the State associated with climate change; (2)  Aggregate climate risk and hazard data that may be used for statewide and regional vulnerability and adaptation planning; (3)  Assess a range of options for the State to adapt to multiple hazards and climate change impacts; and (4)  Recommend land use, development, and infrastructure adaptations to protect and enhance local economies, the environment, and community well-being for the present and future benefit of the people of the State. (c) The Hawaii climate adaptation and resilience implementation plan shall incorporate the recommendations of the Hawaii 2050 sustainability plan pursuant to section 226-65; the Hawaii sea level rise vulnerability and adaptation report pursuant to section 225P-3; the multi-hazard mitigation plan; the State's reports coordinating sea level adaptation activities pursuant to section 225M-9; the Hawaii drought plan; the Hawaii water plan; statewide community-based wildfire protection plans; county general plans; and county climate and sustainability plans, as needed. (d) The office shall submit the Hawaii climate adaptation and resilience implementation plan to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to fund the following: (1)  Two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) planner V positions; (2)  One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) planner IV position; and (3)  Computers, publication costs, website and multimedia public outreach, management and service fees, and other expenses necessary for the office of planning and sustainable development to develop and publish a Hawaii climate adaptation and resilience implementation plan pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of planning and sustainable development for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2050.